Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 394.25, subdivision 3c, is amended to read: Subd. 3c. Feedlot zoning ordinances. (a) A county proposing to adopt a new feedlot ordinance or amend an existing feedlot ordinance must notify the Pollution Control Agency and commissioner of agriculture at the beginning of the process, no later than the notice of the first hearing proposing to adopt or amend an ordinance purporting to address feedlots. (b) Prior to final approval of a feedlot ordinance, a county board may submit a copy of the proposed ordinance to the Pollution Control Agency and to the commissioner of agriculture and request review, comment, and recommendations on the environmental and agricultural effects from specific provisions in the ordinance. (c) The agencies' response to the county may include: (1) any recommendations for improvements in the ordinance; and (2) the legal, social, economic, or scientific justification for each recommendation under clause (1). (d) At the request of the county board, the county must prepare a report on the economic effects from specific provisions in the ordinance. Economic analysis must state whether the ordinance will affect the local economy and describe the kinds of businesses affected and the projected impact the proposal will have on those businesses. To assist the county, the commissioner of agriculture, in cooperation with the Department of Employment and Economic Development, must develop a template for measuring local economic effects and make it available to the county. The report must be submitted to the commissioners of employment and economic development and agriculture along with the proposed ordinance. (e) A local ordinance that contains a setback for new feedlots from existing residences must also provide for a new residence setback from existing feedlots located in areas zoned agricultural at the same distances and conditions specified in the setback for new feedlots, unless the new residence is built to replace an existing residence. A county may grant a variance from this requirement under section 394.27, subdivision 7. new text begin (f) Notwithstanding setback requirements for animal feedlots under Minnesota Rules, chapter 7020, and part 4725.4450, a local ordinance may approve up to 24 chickens on any lot. new text end